Louisiana, session 2026, HB1232.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 34:3471(6) and (7), 3472(A) and (D), 3473, 3475(A), 3477(A) and
(D), and 3478 are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3471. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the
following definitions shall apply:
* * *
(6) "Waterway dredging and deepening priority program Assistance
Program" means the priority list of projects submitted by to the office and selected
and approved by the joint committee pursuant to this Chapter.
(7) "Waterway project" means a program project, either new or continuing,
that is planned and implemented with the primary goal of dredging and deepening
waterways in the state to include cost share projects with the federal government and
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1232 ENROLLED
construction and maintenance costs associated with dredging and disposing of
dredged material.
§3472. Methodology for dredging and deepening project Waterway Assistance
Program evaluation
A.(1) Applications for funding of any waterway project may be submitted
by any governmental entity, including but not limited to a parish, municipality, port
authority, or levee district on a quarterly basis, except as provided in R.S. 34:3476.
Applications shall be submitted to the office no later than the first of March, June,
September, and December of each calendar year for consideration of funding or
funding obligation authority in the following fiscal years. Applications submitted
in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter shall be subject to the provisions
of R.S. 39:101 through 128. Information to be provided in the application shall
include but not be limited to the following:
(a) Description of the project and demonstration of immediate need for the
project.
(b) Preliminary project design and cost estimate.
(c) Description of project area.
(2) No project shall be considered without any and all local, state, and
federal permits obtained and required by the department, as determined per project,
pursuant to applicable law.
(2) (3) Project applications shall not be subject to formal review and
evaluation until the information required in the application has been submitted.
* * *
D. The office may contract for any of the duties associated with the
development of the waterway dredging and deepening priority program, including
but not limited to the development, review, and evaluation of plans and
specifications, and the development of the waterway dredging and deepening priority
program list. However, development of and authority over the final determination
of the waterway dredging and deepening priority list shall remain with the
department and the joint committee as provided in this Chapter. The project
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1232 ENROLLED
evaluation process shall be submitted by the office for approval by the joint
committee no later than September 1, 2026.
* * *
§3473. Priority list List of projects; public hearings; final program
Each quarter, the The office shall prepare and furnish to the joint committee
a prioritized list of qualifying projects based on the applications received by the
office. during that quarter. The joint committee shall receive the prioritized list of
projects from the office for each of the first three quarters of the year, and shall call
a public hearing within thirty days of receiving the list in order to receive public
testimony regarding any project on the list. At such hearing, the joint committee
shall vote to either accept, reject, or modify the list. Each quarter, the office shall
reprioritize the list of projects to reflect the cumulative list of projects recommended
by the office. After application recommendations for the last quarter are made by
the office, the office shall submit the final waterway dredging and deepening priority
program for the ensuing fiscal year to the joint committee for approval. Prior to the
convening of the regular session of the legislature, the The joint committee shall hold
a public hearing for the purpose of reviewing the final program for the ensuing
current fiscal year. Prior to such hearing, the office shall publish the appropriate
official notice on the department's website. The final program shall be based upon
the anticipated revenues to be appropriated by the legislature or other funding
obligation authority and the projects shall be listed in order of priority. Upon review
of eligible projects, the joint committee shall establish a list based on the amount
appropriated to the program established by the legislature. When this final
construction program list is presented to the legislature for funding or funding
obligation authority for the ensuing fiscal year, the legislature shall not add any
projects to this final construction program. Any project recommended by the office
and approved considered by the joint committee for which funds are unavailable in
the fiscal year but for which it was approved shall remain on the prioritized list of
projects and shall not be removed unless voted on by the joint committee the
following year be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1232 ENROLLED
§3475. Projects undertaken by the office
A. After adoption of the office's recommendations by the joint committee,
the approved list of projects shall be forwarded to the office for implementation. The
approved list shall be implemented by the office by the use of funds appropriated,
funding obligation authority, or pursuant to the cash management program as
provided by R.S. 48:251(D). Funding or funding obligation authority shall be
allocated to projects in accordance with the prioritized list of projects approved by
the joint committee. Funding obligation authority may be granted or authorized for
a project from funds appropriated or obligated for another project or projects within
the Waterway Dredging and Deepening Priority Assistance Program provided that
such authority does not impede such any project or projects. Such The funding
obligation authority shall be extinguished for a project at such time as funds are
made available for obligation for the project. The office shall not delete, add, or
substitute any projects for those approved by the joint committee, except as provided
in R.S. 34:3476.
* * *
§3477. Allocation, reallocation of funds; deposit to Dredging and Deepening
Waterway Assistance Fund
A. The Dredging and Deepening Waterway Assistance Fund is hereby
created within the state treasury and shall be a source of state funds in addition to
capital outlay projects, the general fund, and other sources, provided for any
waterway project on the priority list approved pursuant to the provisions of this
Chapter.
* * *
D. Any monies allocated for any project not needed for said project may be
reallocated for the completion of any other project or projects specified. Any monies
not needed for the completion of said projects shall be deposited in and credited to
the Dredging and Deepening Waterway Assistance Fund.
* * *
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1232 ENROLLED
§3478. Preparation of plans and specifications; letting of bids for construction;
supervision of construction
The port applying governing authority shall be responsible for the preparation
of plans and specifications for their respective project. The port applying governing
authority shall also be responsible for the letting of bids, the public advertising, and
the supervision of work for all projects, all in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter.
Section 2. R.S. 34:3474 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.